Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16C.0726] STATE PURCHASE OF CERTAIN SINGLE-USE PLASTIC PRODUCTS; PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "food service ware" means products used for serving, holding, packaging, or transporting prepared food and beverages, including but not limited to plates, bowls, cups, lids, straws, trays, cutlery, and clamshell containers; and new text end new text begin (2) "single-use product" means a product designed and manufactured to be used only once before disposal. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner and state agencies purchasing under delegated authority must not purchase and must issue bid specifications that prohibit the purchase of, the following single-use products composed of plastic: new text end new text begin (1) food service ware; and new text end new text begin (2) bottles whose capacity does not exceed 21 fluid ounces. new text end new text begin (c) Paragraph (b) does not apply when: new text end new text begin (1) products that are not prohibited under paragraph (b) are unavailable; new text end new text begin (2) purchases are made in preparation of or in response to an emergency; or new text end new text begin (3) the purchase of products that are not prohibited under paragraph (b) is necessary: new text end new text begin (i) to protect health, safety, or welfare; or new text end new text begin (ii) to accommodate persons with disabilities. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to bid specifications issued on or after that date. new text end